Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.100

Application forms—Employment—Licenses—Mention of race or religion prohibited—Penalty.

(1) The inclusion of any question relative to an applicant's race or religion in any application blank or form for employment or license required to be filled in and submitted by an applicant to any department, board, commission, officer, agent, or employee of this state or the disclosure on any license of the race or religion of the licensee is hereby prohibited.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 221; 1965 c 8 s 43.01.100. Prior: 1955 c 87 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Discrimination—Human rights commission: Chapter 49.60 RCW.